North Carolina statutes. Chapter 64. Aliens.
Article 1. Various Provisions Related to Aliens.

§ 64-1.
Rights as to real property.

It is lawful for aliens to take both by purchase and descent, or other operation of law, any lands, tenements or hereditaments, and to hold and convey the same as fully as citizens of this State can or may do, any law or usage to the contrary notwithstanding.

History.

1870-1, c. 255; Code, s. 7; Rev., s. 182; C.S., s. 192; 1935, c. 243; 1939, c. 19.

Cross References.

As to the Intestate Succession Act, see

G.S. 29-1

et seq.

§ 64-1.1.
Secretary of State to collect information as to foreign ownership of real property. [Repealed.]

History.

1979, c. 610; repealed by 2021-180, s. 37.11(a), effective November 18, 2021.

§ 64-2.
Contracts validated.

All contracts to purchase or sell real estate by or with aliens, heretofore made, shall be deemed and taken as valid to all intents and purposes.

History.

1870-1, c. 255, s. 2; Code, s. 8; Rev., s. 183; C.S., s. 193.

§ 64-3.
Nonresident aliens’ rights of inheritance.

No alien residing outside the United States or its territories shall be entitled to take personal property located in this State by succession or testamentary disposition if the laws of the nation of which such alien is a resident prohibit residents of the United States from inheriting personal property located within that nation. Except as hereinabove provided, no alien shall, by reason of his citizenship or place of residence, be disqualified from inheriting property in this State.

History.

1959, c. 1208; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 797, s. 1.

§ 64-4.
Escheats.

If a decedent owning personal property located within North Carolina shall leave no heirs, heirs at law or devisees other than persons disqualified from inheritance under

G.S. 64-3

, then such personal property shall escheat.

History.

1959, c. 1208; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 797, s. 2; 2011-284, s. 60.

§ 64-5.
Burden of proof.

The burden of proof in any action or proceeding to disqualify a nonresident alien from taking personal property located within this State by succession or testamentary disposition by reason of the provisions of

G.S. 64-3

, shall be upon the person asserting the disqualification.

History.

1959, c. 1208; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 797, s. 3.

§§ 64-6 through 64-24.

Reserved for future codification purposes.